Idaho, session 2026, S1249.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. IDAHO CODE CLEANUP -- LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent
of the Legislature to ensure that the state laws provided in Idaho Code are
streamlined, up-to-date, and essential for the citizens of Idaho, while best
serving the public health, safety, and welfare. In accordance with the Idaho
Code Cleanup Act, following comprehensive review, the Legislature has iden-
tified the provisions of this act as obsolete, outdated, or unnecessary.
SECTION 2. That Section 20-524A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
20-524A. DEPARTMENT'S PAYMENT OF DETENTION COSTS. If the juvenile of-
fender is committed to the custody of the department of juvenile corrections
pursuant to chapter 5, title 20, Idaho Code, the department shall reimburse
the county for the period of time in excess of five (5) calendar days during
which the juvenile offender is housed at a detention center. This time pe-
riod shall begin to run on the first business day the department receives a
copy of the order of commitment, executed by the court. Orders received by
the department after 3 o'clock p.m., mountain standard time, on a business
day, will be considered to have been received the next business day. Facsim-
ile transmissions of the order are acceptable.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.